Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5288.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 36.32.070 (Vacancies on board) and 2015 c 53 s 65, 2003 c 238 s 3, 1990 c 252 s 7, & 1963 c 4 s 36.32.070; and(2) RCW 36.32.0558 (Five-member commissionsâVacancies) and 2015 c 53 s 64, 2003 c 238 s 2, & 1990 c 252 s 6.--- END ---